Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
606

CLERKS,
REPORTERS, INTERPRETERS, ETC.

Section

606-1 Clerks of supreme court, intermediate
appellate court,

circuit courts, and district courts;
appointment and

removal

606-2 Temporary assistants

606-3 Seal of court; physical or electronic
seal, signature,

or attestation on physical or electronic
court records

606-4 Custody; disposition of exhibits

606-5 Free copies of certain decrees to veterans

606-6, 7 Repealed

606-8 Powers and duties of clerks

606-9 to 11 Repealed

606-12 Duties of official court reporters

606-12.5 Certified shorthand reporter;
administration of oaths

or affirmations

606-13 Salary and perquisites of official court
reporters

606-13.5 Definitions

606-13.6 Private court reporters; contracts

606-13.7 Official court reporters' notes; ownership

606-14 Bailiffs

606-15 Repealed

Cross References

Office of language access, see chapter 321C.

Rules of Court

Court interpreter certification program, see Hawaii Rules for
Certification of Spoken and Sign Language Interpreters.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next